Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-113
Commissioners and employees; expenses and mileage.

The commissioners, the executive director of the commission, and all employees of the commission shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. The commission may also incur necessary expenses for office furniture and other incidental expenses. No commissioner, executive director, or employee of the commission shall request or be allowed mileage or other traveling expenses unless such sections are strictly complied with.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 14, p. 382;

Laws 1941, c. 180, § 15, p. 709;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-314;

R.S.1943, § 53-113;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 94;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 8;

Laws 1989, LB 780, § 6;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 8;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 45.